New York, session 2025-2026, A2073.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 2222 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as added by chapter 839 of the laws of 1973, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 5. Application. The owner of each snowmobile requiring registration 5 under this section shall present an application for registration to the 6 commissioner, on a blank to be prepared and furnished by the commission- 7 er for that purpose. Such application shall contain or be accompanied by 8 such evidence of the ownership of the snowmobile described in the appli- 9 cation as may be required by the commissioner. Where the snowmobile 10 owner is a citizen of Canada, no registration shall be required, but a 11 trail pass as described in subdivision five-a of this section shall be 12 required. 13 § 2. Section 2222 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding 14 a new subdivision 5-a to read as follows: 15 5-a. Canadian citizen trail pass. All applicable fees shall be paid to 16 receive a trail pass. Trail pass fees shall be equal to those described 17 in subdivisions four and four-a of this section, in addition to any 18 other applicable fees prescribed by law. Passes shall not authorize the 19 use of a snowmobile other than for pleasure, and shall require compli- 20 ance with all laws and regulations applicable to the use of snowmobiles 21 in New York state. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04590-01-5 A. 2073 2 1 (a) Passes shall expire after one year, must be prominently displayed 2 on the cowl of the snowmobile at all times when the snowmobile is within 3 the borders of New York state. 4 (b) Trail passes shall be sold in the following counties only: Clin- 5 ton, Essex, Franklin, Hamilton, Herkimer, Jefferson, Lewis, Oswego, and 6 St. Lawrence. 7 (c) Passes will be sold by businesses approved by the commissioner of 8 parks, recreation and historic preservation. 9 (d) Applications for a trail pass must be accompanied by valid Canadi- 10 an registration. 11 (e) Passes shall be issued with information concerning the laws and 12 regulations of New York state that pertain to the safe and legal opera- 13 tion of a snowmobile within New York state's borders. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 15 have become a law and shall expire January 1, 2033 when upon such date 16 the provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed. Effective imme- 17 diately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 18 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 19 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.